Hawaii statutes.
§39-76 Validation of proceedings. All
proceedings taken with respect to the contracting of revenue bonded
indebtedness and the issuance, sale, execution, and delivery of revenue bonds
by or on behalf of this State, are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and
confirmed, notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in any proceedings or
in the issuance, execution, sale, or delivery, and the revenue bonds so issued
or to be issued are and shall be valid obligations of the State. [L 1988, c 28,
pt of §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next